Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 4303, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4303. As used in the Oklahoma Quality Events Incentive
Act:
1. "Certified sponsor" means an entity or organization
authorized to promote and conduct a quality event, which is
incurring expenses for the promotion of such event to be conducted
within the corporate limits of an eligible municipality or an
unincorporated area within a county;
HB4337 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. "Economic impact study" means a study which includes:
a. a description and, if applicable, history of the
quality event,
b. information regarding the site selection process for
the quality event,
c. an estimate of the expenses anticipated to be incurred
in connection with hosting the quality event,
d. an estimate of the total gross sales made by vendors
during any period of time during which no quality
event activity occurs,
e. a detailed estimate of the anticipated increase in
sales tax revenue directly attributable to the quality
event, and
f. the general economic impact likely to occur as a
result of the preparation for, occurrence of and
activity occurring in connection with the dissolution
of, a quality event;
3. "Eligible local support amounts" means:
a. any payment made by a local government entity or
transfer of monies from the general fund or transfer
of tax revenues derived from a locally imposed tax to
a certified sponsor for the purpose of attracting,
promoting, advertising, organizing, conducting or
otherwise supporting a quality event, or
HB4337 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

b. any direct payment made by a certified sponsor to a
for-profit or nonprofit entity, other than the host
community, for the purpose of attracting, promoting,
advertising, organizing, conducting or otherwise
supporting a quality event;
4. "Event history" means:
a. historical information on the event including past
locations of the event,
b. a description of previous attempts by the host
community to secure the event,
c. information regarding attempts by other communities to
recruit the event, and
d. if applicable, the competitive bidding process for
securing the event by the host community;
5. "Host community" means any county, incorporated city or
town, or any combination of counties, incorporated cities or towns
of the state which are authorized by their respective governing
bodies to host or assist in the presentation of a quality event;
6. "Incremental sales tax revenue" means the amount of
additional state sales tax revenue collected as a result of the
quality event, as determined by an economic impact study verified by
the Oklahoma Tax Commission;


HB4337 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

7. "New event" means a quality event which did not occur within
a period of twenty-four (24) months prior to the month during which
a quality event is held;
8. "Quality event" means:
a. a new event or a meeting of a nationally recognized
organization or its members,
b. a new or existing event that is a national,
international or world championship, or
c. a new or existing event that is managed or produced by
an Oklahoma-based national or international
organization, or
d. a nationally televised event by a nationally
recognized sanctioned body;
9. "Recurring event" means a quality event which occurred at
least once within the twenty-four (24) months prior to the month
during which a quality event is held;
10. "State sales tax revenue" means the proceeds from the state
sales tax levy imposed pursuant to Section 1354 of this title upon
taxable transactions occurring as a result of the quality event, as
determined by an economic impact study verified by the Oklahoma Tax
Commission; and
11. "Vendors" means those persons or business entities making
taxable sales of tangible personal property or services as a result
of the quality event, as determined by an economic impact study
HB4337 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

veri fied by the Oklahoma Tax Commission and, unless the context
otherwise requires, shall have the same meaning as defined by
Section 1352 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS AND BUDGET, dated
03/09/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended.


















HB4337 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.